California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(B) Any notice of the opening or initiation of an investigation of the nonlicensee owner by the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
 or its designee.

(C) Any notice of the opening or initiation of an investigation of the nonlicensee owner by another professional licensing agency.

(3) The report required by paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be signed by the nonlicensee owner and set forth the facts that constitute the reportable event. If the reportable event involves the action of an
 administrative agency or court, the report shall identify the name of the agency or court, the title of the matter, and the date of occurrence of the event.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, reports received by the board pursuant to paragraph (2) shall not be disclosed to the public pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) other than (A) in the course of any disciplinary proceeding by the board after the filing of a formal accusation, (B) in the course of any legal action to which the board is a party, (C) in response to an official inquiry from a state or federal agency, (D) in response to a subpoena or summons enforceable by order of a court, or (E) when otherwise specifically required by law.

(5) Nothing in this subdivision shall impose a duty upon any licensee or nonlicensee owner to report to the board the occurrence of any events set forth in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) or paragraph (2) of this subdivision either by or against any other nonlicensee owner.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Licensee” means a certified public accountant or public accountant in this state or a certified public accountant in good standing in another state.

(2) “Material participation” means an activity that is regular, continuous, and substantial.

(d) All firms
 with nonlicensee owners shall certify at the time of registration and renewal that the firm is in compliance with this section.

(e) The board shall adopt regulations to implement, interpret, or make specific this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 11.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Certificates, Information and Records [5080. - 5095.]

5080.

The “certified public accountant” license shall be granted by the board to any person who meets the requirements of this article, has not committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of a license under Section 480, and files an application for licensure on a form provided by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1278, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5080.1.

The board may require an applicant for a certified public accountant license to appear in person to determine if the applicant’s qualifications are as prescribed in this chapter and in rules adopted by the board.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5081.3 by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1278, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5081.

An applicant for an authorization to be admitted to the examination for a certified public accountant license shall:

(a) Not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of a license under Section 480.

(b) File the application prescribed by the board. This application shall not be considered filed unless all required supporting documents, fees, and the fully completed board-approved application form are received in the board office or submitted via a board-provided electronic application or filed by mail.

(c) Meet one of the educational requirements specified in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 2.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5082.

An applicant for a certified public accountant license shall have successfully passed an examination in subjects the board deems appropriate, and in the form and manner that the board deems appropriate. The board may, by regulation, prescribe the methods for applying for and conducting the examination, including methods for grading and determining a passing grade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 807, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5082.1.

(a) The examination required by the board for the granting of a license as a certified public accountant may be conducted by the board or by a public or private organization specified by the board. The examination may be conducted under a uniform examination system.

(b) The board may make arrangements with a public or private organization for the conduct of the examination, as deemed necessary by the board. The board may contract with a public or private organization for materials
 or services related to the examination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 807, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5082.2.

A candidate who fails an examination provided for in this article shall have the right to reexamination pursuant to the provisions of this article and regulations adopted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 909, Sec. 19.   Effective September 30, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5082.3.

An applicant for a license as a certified public accountant may be deemed by the board to have met the examination requirements of Section 5082 if the applicant satisfies all of the following requirements:

(a) The applicant is licensed or has comparable authority under the laws of any country to engage in the practice of public accountancy.

(b) The International Qualifications Appraisal Board jointly established by the National Association of State Boards of Accountancy and the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants has determined that the standards under which the applicant was licensed or under which the applicant secured comparable authority meet its standards for admission to the International Uniform
 Certified Public Accountant Qualification Examination.

(c) The applicant has successfully passed the International Uniform Certified Public Accountant Qualification Examination referenced in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 3.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5082.4.

A Canadian Chartered Accountant in good standing may be deemed by the board to have met the examination requirements of Section 5082 if they have successfully passed the Canadian Chartered Accountant Uniform Certified Public Accountant Qualification Examination of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants or the International Uniform Certified Public Accountant Qualification Examination referenced in subdivision (b) Section 5082.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 4.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5082.5.

The board may give credit to a candidate who has passed all or part of the examination in another state if the members of the board determine that the standards under which the examination was held are as high as the standards established for the examination in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 5.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5087.

(a) The board may issue a certified public accountant license to any applicant who is a holder of a current, active, and unrestricted certified public accountant license issued under the laws of any state with comparable licensure requirements and who has not committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial under Section 480. To be authorized to sign reports on attest engagements, the applicant shall meet the requirements of Section 5095.

(b) The board may in particular cases waive any of the requirements regarding the circumstances in which the various parts of the examination were to be passed for an applicant from another state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 7.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5088.

Any individual who is the holder of a current, active, and unrestricted license as a certified public accountant issued under the laws of any state and who applies to the board for a license as a certified public accountant under the provisions of Section 5087 may, until the time the application for a license is granted or denied, practice public accountancy in this state only under a practice privilege pursuant to the provisions of Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 5096), except that, for purposes of this section, the individual is not disqualified from a practice privilege during the period the application is pending by virtue of maintaining an office or principal place of business, or both, in this state. The board may by regulation provide for exemption, credit, or proration of fees to avoid duplication of
 fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 8.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5090.

An applicant for the certified public accountant license shall comply with the education, examination, and experience requirements in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 9.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.

(a) To qualify for the certified public accountant license, an applicant who is applying under this section shall meet the education, examination, and experience requirements specified in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), or otherwise prescribed pursuant to this article. The board may adopt regulations as necessary to implement this section.

(b) (1) An applicant for admission to the certified public accountant examination under this section shall present satisfactory evidence that the applicant has completed a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a degree-granting university, college, or other institution of learning accredited by an accrediting agency included in a list of these agencies published by the United States Secretary of
 Education under the requirements of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965 as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.), or meeting, at a minimum, the standards described in Section 5094. The total educational program shall include a minimum of 24 semester units in accounting subjects and 24 semester units in business-related subjects. This evidence shall be provided at the time of application for admission to the examination, except that an applicant who applied, qualified, and sat for at least two subjects of the examination for the certified public accountant license before May 15, 2002, may provide this evidence at the time of application for licensure.

(A) An applicant enrolled in a program at an institution as described in this paragraph that grants conferral of a baccalaureate degree upon completion of the 150 semester units required by paragraph (2) of this subdivision may satisfy the requirements of this paragraph if the applicant’s
 institution sends electronically or delivers the applicant’s official transcript or its equivalent together or separately with a letter signed by the institution’s registrar, or its equivalent, directly to the board pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5094. The letter shall include all of the following:

(i) A statement that the applicant is enrolled and in good standing in a program that will result in the conferral of a baccalaureate degree upon completion of either a master’s degree or the 150 semester units required by paragraph (2) of this subdivision.

(ii) A statement that the applicant has completed all requirements, including general education and elective requirements, for a baccalaureate degree and the only reason the college or university has yet to confer the degree is because the applicant is enrolled in a program that confers a baccalaureate degree upon completion
 of either a master’s degree or the 150 semester units required by paragraph (2) of this subdivision.

(iii) The date on which the applicant met all of the college’s or university’s requirements for conferral of a baccalaureate degree.

(B) The total educational program for an applicant described in subparagraph (A) shall include a minimum of 24 semester units in accounting subjects and 24 semester units in business-related subjects. This evidence shall be provided at the time of application for admission to the examination, except that an applicant who applied, qualified, and sat for at least two subjects of the examination for the certified public accountant license before May 15, 2002, may provide this evidence at the time of application for licensure.

(2) An applicant for issuance of the certified public accountant
 license under this section shall present satisfactory evidence that the applicant has completed at least 150 semester units of college education, including a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university, meeting, at a minimum, the standards described in Section 5094, the total educational program to include a minimum of 24 semester units in accounting subjects, 24 semester units in business-related subjects, and, after December 31, 2013, shall also include a minimum of 10 units of ethics study consistent with the requirements set forth in Section 5094.3 and 20 units of accounting study consistent with the regulations promulgated under subdivision (c) of Section 5094.6. This evidence shall be presented at the time of application for the certified public accountant license. Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed inconsistent with Section 5094 or 5094.6. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to be inconsistent with prevailing academic practice regarding the completion of
 units.

(c) An applicant for the certified public accountant license shall pass an examination prescribed by the board.

(d) (1) The applicant shall show, to the satisfaction of the board, that the applicant has had one year of qualifying experience. This experience may include providing any type of service or advice involving the use of accounting, attest, compilation, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, or consulting skills.

(2) To be qualifying under this section, experience shall have been performed in accordance with applicable professional standards. Experience in public accounting shall be completed under the supervision or in the employ of a person licensed or otherwise having comparable authority under the laws of any state or country to engage in the practice of public
 accountancy. Experience in private or governmental accounting or auditing shall be completed under the supervision of an individual licensed by a state to engage in the practice of public accountancy.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the board may, by regulation, allow experience in academia to be qualifying under this section.

(e) Applicants completing education at a college or university located outside of this state, meeting, at a minimum, the standards described in Section 5094, shall be deemed to meet the educational requirements of this section if the board determines that the education is substantially equivalent to the standards of education specified under this chapter.

(f) An applicant who has successfully passed the examination requirement specified under Section 5082 on or before December 31, 2013, may
 qualify for the certified public accountant license without satisfying the 10 semester units of study set forth in Section 5094.3 or 20 semester units of accounting study consistent with the regulations promulgated under Section 5094.6, if the applicant completes all other requirements for the issuance of a license on or before December 31, 2015.

(g) The education and experience requirements of this section are notwithstanding Sections 5093.2 and 5093.3 and pertain to applicants who submit an application for licensure by December 31, 2028, inclusive of qualifying experience and satisfactory evidence of meeting the education requirements of this section.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 11.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.2.

(a) An applicant for admission to the certified public accountant examination under Section 5082 shall meet the educational requirements by presenting satisfactory evidence that the applicant has completed one of the following:

(1) The applicant was conferred a board-recognized baccalaureate or advanced accounting degree. The board may recognize accounting degrees conferred by United States institutions of higher education that require the completion of an accounting concentration of courses pursuant to regulations established pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(2) (A) The applicant was conferred a baccalaureate or advanced degree not recognized by
 the board and completed an accounting concentration of courses.

(B) The board shall establish by regulation an accounting concentration of courses required to be completed to satisfy the requirements of this section. 

(3) The applicant is enrolled in a dual degree program at an institution of higher education that confers a baccalaureate degree, as described in paragraph (1) or (2), upon conferral of a master’s degree. Satisfactory evidence shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) A statement that the applicant is enrolled and in good standing in a dual degree program at an institution of higher education that will result in the conferral of a baccalaureate degree, as described in paragraph (1) or (2), upon conferral of a master’s degree.

(B) The date the applicant completed all educational requirements for a baccalaureate degree at their enrolled institution of higher education.

(C) Degrees to be conferred.

(4) (A) The applicant is enrolled in an institution of higher education and is within 180 days of completing the education requirements set forth in paragraph (1) or (2).

(B) Within 240 days of submitting an application to qualify for the examination, the applicant shall provide the board with satisfactory evidence that they have completed the educational requirement set forth in paragraph (1) or (2). Failure to comply with this subparagraph may result in the loss of any credit received for passage of any part of the examination before the requirement described in paragraph (1) or (2) was met.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 12.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.3.

(a) An applicant seeking certified public accountant licensure shall show, to the satisfaction of the board, completion of two years of qualifying experience and passage of the certified public accountant examination under Section 5082. This experience may include providing any type of service or advice involving the use of accounting, attest, compilation, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, or consulting skills. The board may also, by regulation, require the completion of specified job tasks associated with minimum competencies of entry-level practice.

(b) To the satisfaction of the board, an advanced degree in an accounting-related subject may be substituted for one year of experience.

(c) The board may, by regulation, accept the completion of board-recognized certificate or training programs as a substitute for a portion of the otherwise required amount of experience.

(d) An applicant may only receive credit for substitution of the experience requirement under either subdivision (b) or (c), but not both. 

(e) To be qualifying under this section, experience shall have been performed in accordance with applicable professional standards. Experience in public accounting shall be completed under the supervision or in the employ of a person certified under the laws of any state or country to engage in the practice of public accountancy. Experience outside of public accounting shall be completed under the supervision of an individual licensed by a state to engage in the practice of public accountancy.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (e), the board may, by regulation, allow experience in academia to be qualifying under this section.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 13.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.5.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 5093, the board may admit an applicant to the certified public accountant examination before the applicant completes the education requirements set forth in Section 5093, if the applicant is enrolled in a degree-granting university, college, or other institution of learning, as defined in Section 5094, and is within 180 days of completing the educational requirements set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 5093.

(b) Within 240 days of submitting an application pursuant to subdivision (a), the applicant shall provide the board with satisfactory evidence that they have completed the educational requirements set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 5093.

(c) Failure to comply with subdivision (b) may result in the loss of any credit received for passage of any part of the certified public accountant examination before the requirement described in subdivision (b) was met.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 14.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5094.

(a) In order for education to be qualifying, it shall meet the standards described in subdivision (b) or (c) of this section.

(b) At a minimum, education shall be from a degree-granting university, college, or other institution of learning accredited by an accrediting agency included in a list of these agencies published by the United States Secretary of Education under the requirements of the Higher Education Act of 1965 as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.).

(c) Education from a degree-granting college, university, or other institution of learning located outside the United States may be qualifying provided it is deemed by the board to be equivalent to education obtained under subdivision (b). The
 board may require an applicant to submit documentation of their education to a credential evaluation service approved by the board for evaluation and to cause the results of this evaluation to be reported to the board in order to assess educational equivalency.

(d) The board shall adopt regulations specifying the criteria and procedures for approval of credential evaluation services. These regulations shall, at a minimum, require that the credential evaluation service (1) furnish evaluations directly to the board, (2) furnish evaluations written in English, (3) be a member of the American Association of Collegiate Registrars and Admissions Officers, NAFSA: Association of International Educators, or the National Association of Credential Evaluation Services, (4) be used by accredited colleges and universities, (5) be reevaluated by the board every five years, (6) maintain a complete set of reference materials as specified by the board, (7) base
 evaluations only upon authentic, original transcripts and degrees and have a written procedure for identifying fraudulent transcripts, (8) include in the evaluation report, for each degree held by the applicant, the equivalent degree offered in the United States, the date the degree was granted, the institution granting the degree, an English translation of the course titles, and the semester unit equivalence for each of the courses, (9) have an appeal procedure for applicants, and (10) furnish the board with information concerning the credential evaluation service that includes biographical information on evaluators and translators, three letters of references from public or private agencies, statistical information on the number of applications processed annually for the past five years, and any additional information the board may require in order to ascertain that the credential evaluation service meets the standards set forth in this subdivision and in any regulations adopted by the board.

(e) Colleges, universities, or other institutions of learning that provide qualifying education as described in subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be referenced as “institutions of higher education” in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 15.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5094.3.

(a) An applicant for licensure as a certified public accountant shall, to the satisfaction of the board, provide documentation of the completion of 10 semester units or 15 quarter units of ethics study, as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5093, in the manner prescribed in this section.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2017, an applicant shall complete 10 semester units or 15 quarter units in courses described in subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (f).

(c) A minimum of three semester units or four quarter units in courses at an upper division level or higher devoted to accounting ethics, accountants’ professional responsibilities, auditing, or fraud unless the course was completed at a
 community college, in which case it need not be completed at the upper division level or higher.

(d) A maximum of 7 semester units or 11 quarter units, in the following subjects relating to ethics:

(1) Business, government, and society.

(2) Business law.

(3) Corporate governance.

(4) Corporate social responsibility.

(5) Ethics.

(6) Fraud.

(7) Human resources management.

(8) Business leadership.

(9) Legal environment of business.

(10) Management of organizations.

(11) Morals.

(12) Organizational behavior.

(13) Professional responsibilities.

(14) Auditing.

(e) (1) A maximum of three semester units or four quarter units in courses taken in the following disciplines:

(A) Philosophy.

(B) Religion.

(C) Theology.

(2) To qualify under this subdivision, the course title shall contain one or more of the terms “introduction,” “introductory,” “general,” “fundamentals of,” “principles,” “foundation of,” or “survey of,” or have the name of the discipline as the sole name of the course title.

(f) A maximum of one semester unit of ethics study for completion of a course specific to financial statement audits.

(g) An applicant who has successfully passed the examination requirement specified under Section 5082 on or before December 31, 2013, is exempt from this section unless the applicant fails to obtain the qualifying experience as specified in Section 5092 or 5093 on or before December 31, 2015.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 16.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5094.6.

(a) The board shall, by regulation, adopt guidelines for accounting study to be included as part of the education required under Section 5093.

(b) For purposes of this section, “accounting study” means independent study or other academic work in accounting, business, ethics, business law, or other academic work relevant to accounting and business, so as to enhance the competency of students as practitioners.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 17.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5095.

(a) To be authorized to sign reports on attest engagements, a licensee shall complete a minimum of 500 hours of experience, satisfactory to the board, in attest services. The board may, by regulation, also require the completion of specified job tasks associated with performing attest services.

(b) To qualify under this section, verified attest experience shall have been performed in accordance with applicable professional standards. Experience in public accounting shall be completed under the supervision or in the employ of a person licensed or otherwise having comparable authority under the laws of any state or country to engage in the practice of public accountancy and provide attest services. Experience outside of public accounting shall be completed under the
 supervision of an individual licensed by a state to engage in the practice of public accountancy and perform attest services. An applicant may be required to present work papers or other evidence substantiating that the applicant has met the requirements of this section and any applicable regulations.

(c) The board shall adopt regulations to implement this section, including, but not limited to, a procedure for applicants under Section 5092 or 5093 to qualify under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 18.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.1. Practice Privileges [5096. - 5096.22.]

5096.

(a) An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state and who has a current and active license, certificate, or permit to practice public accountancy from another state may, subject to the conditions and limitations in this article, engage in the practice of public accountancy in this state under a practice privilege without obtaining a certificate or license under this chapter.

(b) An individual who qualifies for the practice privilege under this section may engage in the practice of public accountancy in this state, and a notice, fee, or other requirement shall not be imposed on that individual by the board.

(c) An individual who qualifies for the practice privilege under this
 section may perform the following services only through a firm of certified public accountants that has obtained a registration from the board pursuant to Section 5096.12:

(1) An audit or review of a financial statement for an entity headquartered in California.

(2) A compilation of a financial statement when that person expects, or reasonably might expect, that a third party will use the financial statement and the compilation report does not disclose a lack of independence for an entity headquartered in California.

(3) An examination of prospective financial information for an entity headquartered in California.

(d) An individual who holds a practice privilege under this article, and is exercising the practice privilege in California:

(1) Is subject to the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board and the courts of this state.

(2) Shall comply with the provisions of this chapter, board regulations, and other laws, regulations, and professional standards applicable to the practice of public accountancy by the licensees of this state and to any other laws and regulations applicable to individuals practicing under practice privileges in this state, except the individual is deemed, solely for the purpose of this article, to have met the continuing education requirements of this state when the individual has met the continuing education requirements of the state in which the individual holds the current and active license, certificate, or permit.

(3) Shall not provide public accountancy services in this state from
 any office located in this state, except as an employee of a firm registered in this state. This paragraph does not apply to public accountancy services provided to a client at the client’s place of business or residence.

(4) Is deemed to have appointed the regulatory agency of the state in which the principal place of business identified by the individual is located, as the individual’s agent on whom notices, subpoenas, or other process may be served in any action or proceeding by the board against the individual.

(5) Shall cooperate with any board investigation or inquiry and shall timely respond to a board investigation, inquiry, request, notice, demand, or subpoena for information or documents and timely provide to the board the identified information and documents.

(6) Shall cease exercising the practice
 privilege in this state if a regulatory agency in a state in which the individual holds a certificate, license, or permit takes disciplinary action resulting in the suspension or revocation, including stayed suspension, stayed revocation, or probation of the individual’s certificate, license, or permit, or takes other disciplinary action against the individual’s certificate, license, or permit that arises from any of the following:

(A) Gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional wrongdoing relating to the practice of public accountancy.

(B) Fraud or misappropriation of funds.

(C) Preparation, publication, or dissemination of false, fraudulent, or materially incomplete or misleading financial statements, reports, or information.

(7) Shall cease
 exercising the practice privilege in this state if convicted in any jurisdiction of any crime involving dishonesty, including, but not limited to, embezzlement, theft, misappropriation of funds or property, or obtaining money, property, or other valuable consideration by fraudulent means or false pretenses.

(8) Shall cease exercising the practice privilege if the United States Securities and Exchange Commission or the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board bars the individual from practicing before them.

(9) Shall cease exercising the practice privilege if any governmental body or agency suspends the right of the individual to practice before the body or agency.

(10) Shall report to the board in writing any pending criminal charges, other than for a minor traffic violation, in any jurisdiction within 30 days of
 the date the individual has knowledge of those charges.

(e) An individual who is required to cease practice pursuant to paragraphs (6) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (d) shall notify the board within 15 calendar days, on a form prescribed by the board, and shall not practice public accountancy in this state pursuant to this section until the individual has received from the board written permission to do so.

(f) An individual who fails to cease practice as required by subdivision (d) or who fails to provide the notice required by subdivision (e) shall be subject to the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board as if the practice privilege were a license and the individual were a licensee. An individual in violation of subdivision (d) or (e) shall, for a minimum of one year from the date the board learns there has been a violation of
 subdivision (d) or (e), not practice in this state and shall not have the possibility of reinstatement during that period. If the board determines that the failure to cease practice or provide the notice was intentional, that individual’s practice privilege shall be revoked and there shall be no possibility of reinstatement for a minimum of two years.

(g) The board shall require an individual who provides notice to the board pursuant to subdivision (e) to cease the practice of public accountancy in this state until the board provides the individual with written permission to resume the practice of public accountancy in this state.

(h) (1) An individual to whom, within the last seven years immediately preceding the date on which the individual wishes to practice in this state, any of the following criteria apply, shall notify the board, on a form prescribed by
 the board, and shall not practice public accountancy in this state pursuant to this section until the board provides the individual with written permission to do so:

(A) The individual has been the subject of any final disciplinary action by the licensing or disciplinary authority of any other jurisdiction with respect to any professional license or has any charges of professional misconduct pending against that individual in any other jurisdiction.

(B) The individual has had their license in another jurisdiction reinstated after a suspension or revocation of the license.

(C) The individual has been denied issuance or renewal of a professional license or certificate in any other jurisdiction for any reason other than an inadvertent administrative error.

(D) The individual has been convicted of a crime or is subject to pending criminal charges in any jurisdiction other than a minor traffic violation.

(E) The individual has otherwise acquired a disqualifying condition as described in subdivision (a) of Section 5096.2.

(2) An individual who fails to cease practice as required by subdivision (d) or who fails to provide the notice required by paragraph (1) shall be subject to the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board as if the practice privilege were a license and the individual were a licensee. An individual in violation of subdivision (d) or paragraph (1) shall, for a minimum of one year from the date the board knows there has been a violation of subdivision (d) or paragraph (1), not practice in this state and shall not have the possibility of reinstatement during that period.
 If the board determines that the failure to cease practice or provide the notice was intentional, that individual shall be prohibited from practicing in this state in the same manner as if a licensee has that licensee’s practice privilege revoked and there shall be no possibility of reinstatement for a minimum of two years.

(i) At the time of notification pursuant to subdivision (e) or (h), if the individual has a valid email address, that individual shall provide that email address to the board.

(j) The board shall consult the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board and the United States Securities and Exchange Commission at least once every six months to identify out-of-state licensees who may have disqualifying conditions or who may be obliged to cease practice, and shall disclose, pursuant to this subdivision, whether those out-of-state licensees are lawfully permitted to
 exercise the privilege. Disclosure of this information shall not be considered discipline.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 19.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.1.

(a) Any individual, not a licensee of this state, who is engaged in any act which is the practice of public accountancy in this state, and who does not qualify to practice pursuant to the practice privilege described in Section 5096 and who has a license, certificate, or other authority to engage in the practice of public accountancy in any other state, regardless of whether active, inactive, suspended, or subject to renewal on payment of a fee or completion of an educational or ethics requirement, is:

(1) Deemed to be practicing public accountancy unlawfully in this state.
